Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0615

Quorum.

(1) Unless the articles of organization provide for a different number, a majority of the total number of directors specified by the organic rules constitutes a quorum for a meeting of the directors. The articles of organization may not provide for a quorum that is less than one-third of the total number of directors specified by the organic rules.

(2) If a quorum of the board of directors is present at the beginning of a meeting, any action taken by the directors present is valid even if withdrawal of directors originally present results in the number of directors being fewer than the number required for a quorum.

(3) A director present at a meeting but objecting to notice under RCW 23.100.0614(2) does not count toward a quorum.

[ 2019 c 37 s 615.]